Utah statutes.
34A-2-407 (Superseded 07/01/10).   Reporting of industrial injuries --
Regulation of health care providers -- Funeral expenses.
(1)  As used in this section, "physician" is as defined in Section 34A-2-111.
(2) (a)  Any employee sustaining an injury arising out of and in the course of
employment shall provide notification to the employee's employer promptly of
the injury.
(b)  If the employee is unable to provide the notification required by
Subsection (2)(a), the following may provide notification of the injury to the
employee's employer:
(i)  the employee's next-of-kin; or
(ii)  the employee's attorney.
(c)  An employee claiming benefits under this chapter, or Chapter 3, Utah
Occupational Disease Act, shall comply with rules adopted by the commission
regarding disclosure of medical records of the employee medically relevant to
the industrial accident or occupational disease claim.
(3) (a)  An employee is barred for any claim of benefits arising from an
injury if the employee fails to notify within the time period described in
Subsection (3)(b):
(i)  the employee's employer in accordance with Subsection (2); or
(ii)  the division.
(b)  The notice required by Subsection (3)(a) shall be made within:
(i)  180 days of the day on which the injury occurs; or
(ii)  in the case of an occupational hearing loss, the time period specified
in Section 34A-2-506.
(4)  The following constitute notification of injury required by Subsection
(2):
(a)  an employer's or physician's injury report filed with:
(i)  the division;
(ii)  the employer; or
(iii)  the employer's insurance carrier; or
(b)  the payment of any medical or disability benefits by:
(i)  the employer; or
(ii)  the employer's insurance carrier.
(5) (a)  In the form prescribed by the division, each employer shall file a
report with the division of any:
(i)  work-related fatality; or
(ii)  work-related injury resulting in:
(A)  medical treatment;
(B)  loss of consciousness;
(C)  loss of work;
(D)  restriction of work; or
(E)  transfer to another job.
(b)  The employer shall file the report required by Subsection (5)(a) within
seven days after:
(i)  the occurrence of a fatality or injury;
(ii)  the employer's first knowledge of the fatality or injury; or
(iii)  the employee's notification of the fatality or injury.
(c) (i)  An employer shall file a subsequent report with the division of any
previously reported injury that later results in death.
(ii)  The subsequent report required by this Subsection (5)(c) shall be filed
with the division within seven days following:
(A)  the death; or
(B)  the employer's first knowledge or notification of the death.
(d)  A report is not required to be filed under this Subsection (5) for minor
injuries, such as cuts or scratches that require first-aid treatment only,
unless:
(i)  a treating physician files a report with the division in accordance with
Subsection (9); or
(ii)  a treating physician is required to file a report with the division in
accordance with Subsection (9).
(6)  An employer required to file a report under Subsection (5) shall provide
the employee with:
(a)  a copy of the report submitted to the division; and
(b)  a statement, as prepared by the division, of the employee's rights and
responsibilities related to the industrial injury.
(7)  Each employer shall maintain a record in a manner prescribed by the
commission by rule of all:
(a)  work-related fatalities; or
(b)  work-related injuries resulting in:
(i)  medical treatment;
(ii)  loss of consciousness;
(iii)  loss of work;
(iv)  restriction of work; or
(v)  transfer to another job.
(8) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (8)(b), an employer who refuses or
neglects to make reports, to maintain records, or to file reports with the
division as required by this section is:
(i)  guilty of a class C misdemeanor; and
(ii)  subject to a civil assessment:
(A)  imposed by the division, subject to the requirements of Title 63G,
Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act; and
(B)  that may not exceed $500.
(b)  An employer is not subject to the civil assessment or guilty of a class C
misdemeanor under this Subsection (8) if:
(i)  the employer submits a report later than required by this section; and
(ii)  the division finds that the employer has shown good cause for submitting
a report later than required by this section.
(c)  A civil assessment collected under this Subsection (8) shall be deposited
into the Uninsured Employers' Fund created in Section 34A-2-704.
(9) (a)  A physician attending an injured employee shall comply with rules
established by the commission regarding:
(i)  fees for physician's services;
(ii)  disclosure of medical records of the employee medically relevant to the
employee's industrial accident or occupational disease claim; and
(iii)  reports to the division regarding:
(A)  the condition and treatment of an injured employee; or
(B)  any other matter concerning industrial cases that the physician is
treating.
(b)  A physician who is associated with, employed by, or bills through a
hospital is subject to Subsection (9)(a).
(c)  A hospital providing services for an injured employee is not subject to
the requirements of Subsection (9)(a) except for rules made by the commission
that are described in Subsection (9)(a)(ii) or (iii).
(d)  The commission's schedule of fees may reasonably differentiate
remuneration to be paid to providers of health services based on:
(i)  the severity of the employee's condition;
(ii)  the nature of the treatment necessary; and
(iii)  the facilities or equipment specially required to deliver that
treatment.
(e)  This Subsection (9) does not prohibit a contract with a provider of
health services relating to the pricing of goods and services.
(10)  A copy of the initial report filed under Subsection (9)(a)(iii) shall be
furnished to:
(a)  the division;
(b)  the employee; and
(c) (i)  the employer; or
(ii)  the employer's insurance carrier.
(11) (a)  Subject to appellate review under Section 34A-1-303, the commission
has exclusive jurisdiction to hear and determine:
(i)  whether goods provided to or services rendered to an employee are
compensable pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease
Act, including:
(A)  medical, nurse, or hospital services;
(B)  medicines; and
(C)  artificial means, appliances, or prosthesis;
(ii)  the reasonableness of the amounts charged or paid for a good or service
described in Subsection (11)(a)(i); and
(iii)  collection issues related to a good or service described in Subsection
(11)(a)(i).
(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (11)(a), Subsection 34A-2-211(7), or
Section 34A-2-212, a person may not maintain a cause of action in any forum
within this state other than the commission for collection or payment for
goods or services described in Subsection (11)(a) that are compensable under
this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act.
